Washington statutes.
RCW 27.34.390

Vancouver national historic reserve.

The legislature affirms that the state of Washington is partner in the Vancouver national historic reserve as mandated under Public Law 104-333: The omnibus parks and public lands management act of 1996. As such, the state will take an active role in supporting the protection, preservation, interpretation, and rehabilitation of the Vancouver national historic reserve.

[ 2007 c 138 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Purpose—2007 c 138: "The three hundred sixty-six acre Vancouver national historic reserve was created by Congress through Public Law 104-333: The "omnibus parks and public lands management act of 1996" in recognition of the significant cultural, historic, and natural resources of the area. The historic reserve includes Fort Vancouver national historic site, Pearson airfield, Pearson air museum, officers row, Vancouver barracks, and a section of the Columbia river waterfront. The four legislatively designated partners in the reserve are the national park service, the United States army, the state of Washington, and the city of Vancouver.

The Vancouver national historic reserve trust, a 501(c)(3), was created in 1998 as the official nonprofit for the reserve. P.L. 104-333 required that the reserve be administered under a general management plan to be developed no later than three years after the enactment of the law. The management plan was adopted in February 2000 with the state of Washington as one of the signatories.

The legislature finds that the state of Washington, as one of four federally designated partners in the Vancouver national historic reserve, should be actively engaged in the protection, preservation, interpretation, and rehabilitation of the historic reserve for the use and benefit of the people of the state. Southwest Washington is a traditionally underserved area of the state with regard to cultural and recreational opportunities. The Vancouver national historic reserve is a unique historic site that offers a variety of historic, cultural, natural, and recreational opportunities and currently serves almost one million visitors per year. From the Hudson's Bay company fort, the story of the early settlers and fur traders to Vancouver barracks, over one hundred fifty years of military history, to the story of pioneering aviation and the golden age of flight at Pearson field, the historic reserve is unique because of the layers of history visitors can experience in one location. In addition, the historic reserve offers acres of green space and waterfront in the midst of the large Portland/Vancouver metropolitan area.

The legislature has declared through RCW 27.34.200 that it is the public policy and in the public interest of the state to designate, preserve, protect, enhance, and perpetuate those structures, sites, districts, buildings, and objects that reflect outstanding elements of the state's historic, archaeological, architectural, or cultural heritage, for the inspiration and enrichment of the people of the state. The Vancouver national historic reserve is on both the state and federal registers as a historic district and encompasses some of the richest historic, archaeological, architectural, and cultural resources in the state.

It is the purpose of this act to:

(1) Confirm the role of the state of Washington in the development and management of the Vancouver national historic reserve;

(2) Identify the role of state agencies in the Vancouver national historic reserve; and

(3) Establish an account in the state treasury through the Washington state historical society for funds designated specifically for the Vancouver national historic reserve." [ 2007 c 138 s 1.]